Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 6. Wireless Enhanced Public Safety Telephone Service Act.

§§ 56-484.8 through 56-484.11.
Repealed by Acts 2000, c. 1064.

Cross references.

For the Enhanced Public Safety Telephone Services Act, see § 56-484.12 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 1064, cl. 2, provides: “That until October 1, 2000, the Wireless E-911 Board, created pursuant to § 56-484.9, shall continue to administer the provisions of the Wireless Enhanced Public Safety Telephone Service Act, including the receipt
and deposit of wireless E-911 surcharges, notwithstanding the creation of the Wireless E-911 Services Board in this act. On October 1, 2000, the responsibility for the administration of the Wireless Enhanced Public Safety Telephone
Service Act or any successor statute shall be transferred to the Wireless E-911 Services Board, created by this act, in accordance with the provisions of this act. The Wireless E-911 Services Board created by this act shall honor all
agreements to which the Wireless E-911 Board, created pursuant to § 56-484.9, is a party.”

Former §§ 56-484.8 through 56-484.11, pertaining to Wireless Enhanced Public Safety Telephone Service Act, derived from Acts 1998, c. 165. Former § 56-484.11, was amended by Acts 1999, c. 530.